Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2205.02
Appraisal review, defined.

Appraisal review means (1) as a noun, the act or process of developing an opinion about the quality of a real property appraiser's work that was performed as part of real property appraisal practice or (2) as an adjective, of or pertaining to an opinion about the quality of another real property appraiser's work that was performed as part of real property appraisal practice.

Laws 2015, LB139, § 7;

Laws 2018, LB741, § 4;

Laws 2020, LB808, § 55.